Maryland, session 2025, HB0686.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
11–931.
(a) For purposes of filing a petition with the United States Citizenship and
Immigration Services for U Nonimmigrant Status, a victim or the victim’s parent,
guardian, or next friend may request a certifying official of a certifying entity to certify
victim helpfulness on a Form I–918, Supplement B certification if the victim:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0686*

HOUSE BILL 686
(1) was a victim of a qualifying criminal activity and has been helpful to
the certifying entity in the detection, investigation, or prosecution of that qualifying
criminal activity;
(2) was under the age of 16 years on the date that an act that constitutes
an element of qualifying criminal activity first occurred and the victim’s parent, guardian,
or next friend has been helpful to the certifying entity in the detection, investigation, or
prosecution of that qualifying criminal activity; or
(3) is incapacitated or incompetent and the victim’s parent, guardian, or
next friend has been helpful to the certifying entity in the detection, investigation, or
prosecution of that qualifying criminal activity.
(b) For purposes of determining helpfulness under subsection (a) of this section,
THERE IS A REBUTTABLE PRESUMPTION THAT if the victim or the victim’s parent,
guardian, or next friend [is assisting, has assisted, or is likely to assist law enforcement
authorities in the detection, investigation, or prosecution of qualifying criminal activity,
the victim or the victim’s parent, guardian, or next friend shall be considered to be helpful,
to have been helpful, or likely to be helpful] HAS NOT REFUSED OR FAILED TO PROVIDE
INFORMATION AND ASSISTANCE REASONABLY REQUESTED BY LAW ENFORCEMENT
AUTHORITIES, THE VICTIM OR THE VICTIM’S PARENT, GUARDIAN, OR NEXT FRIEND
SHALL BE CONSIDERED TO BE HELPFUL, TO HAVE BEEN HELPFUL, OR LIKELY TO BE
HELPFUL TO THE DETECTION, INVESTIGATION, OR PROSECUTION OF THE
QUALIFYING CRIMINAL ACTIVITY.
(c) If the victim or the victim’s parent, guardian, or next friend satisfies the
criteria specified under subsection (a) of this section, the certifying official shall fully
complete and sign the Form I–918, Supplement B certification and, with respect to victim
helpfulness, include:
(1) specific details about the nature of the crime investigated or prosecuted;
(2) a detailed description of the victim’s helpfulness or likely helpfulness to
the detection, investigation, or prosecution of the criminal activity; and
(3) copies of any documents in the possession of the certifying official that
evince the harm endured by the victim due to the criminal activity.
(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the certifying
entity shall certify or decline certification of the Form I–918, Supplement B certification
within [90] 30 days after receiving a request under subsection (a) of this section.
(2) If a noncitizen victim is the subject of removal, exclusion, or deportation
proceedings or subject to a final order of removal, exclusion, or deportation, the certifying

HOUSE BILL 686 3
entity shall certify or decline certification of the Form I–918, Supplement B certification
within [14] 7 days after receiving a request under subsection (a) of this section.
(e) A current investigation, the filing of charges, a prosecution, or a conviction is
not required for a victim or the victim’s parent, guardian, or next friend to request and
obtain the Form I–918, Supplement B certification under this section.
(f) A certifying official may withdraw the certification provided under this section
only on refusal to provide information and assistance when reasonably requested of:
(1) the victim; or
(2) the victim’s parent, guardian, or next friend if the victim was under the
age of 16 years on the date that an act that constitutes an element of qualifying criminal
activity first occurred or if the victim is incapacitated or incompetent.
(g) A certifying entity may disclose information relating to a victim who is seeking
or has obtained U Nonimmigrant Status only:
(1) in order to comply with federal law, court order, or a discovery
obligation in the prosecution of a criminal offense; or
(2) after adult petitioners for U Nonimmigrant Status or adult U
Nonimmigrant Status holders have provided written consent for the disclosure of the
information.
(h) (1) Except in cases of willful or wanton misconduct, a certifying entity or
certifying official who acts or fails to act in good faith in compliance with this section has
the immunity from liability described under § 5–643 of the Courts Article.
(2) A person who brings an action to seek enforcement of this section may
not be awarded attorney’s fees or costs unless the action demonstrates willful or wanton
misconduct by a certifying entity or certifying official.
(I) A CERTIFYING ENTITY SHALL DEVELOP PROTOCOLS TO ASSIST
PETITIONERS WHO HAVE LIMITED ENGLISH PROFICIENCY TO PROCEED UNDER THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.